Wyoming statutes. Title 15 Cities and Towns
Article 3. Changing Form of Government

§ 15-11-301.
Forms of government authorized; procedure for change.

An incorporated city or town may adopt the commission or city manager form of government or other lawful form of government as follows:

An incorporated city or town shall submit to the vote of the electors the question whether to change the form of government on the petition of qualified electors residing in the city or town equal in number to fifteen percent (15%) of the number of electors voting at the last preceding municipal general election;

A petition for a special election on the question of changing the form of government shall be filed with the city clerk at least one hundred twenty (120) days prior to the next regular municipal primary election;

A petition for change of the form of government may not be filed within four (4) years after the existing form of government was established;

When such petition is filed and determined by the city clerk to be legally sufficient, the mayor shall proclaim a special election on the question stating the present form of government, the proposed new form of government, and the time of the election. The proclamation shall be published at least once a week for four (4) consecutive weeks in a newspaper of general circulation in the city or town;

The special election on the question of change of the form of government shall be held not less than thirty (30) days nor more than sixty (60) days after the petition is filed;

Such special election shall be conducted in the manner prescribed by W.S.

22-23-801

through

22-23-809

;

If the majority of votes cast are in favor of the proposed new form of government, the municipality shall at the next municipal primary and general elections nominate and elect officers under the new form of government. When the officers are elected and qualified, the municipality shall be governed by the new form of government;

Immediately after the special election on the question of change of form of government, the mayor shall certify the result of the election to the county clerk and the secretary of state.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-348; W.S. 1977, §

22-23-701

; Laws 1998, ch. 100, § 4.

Cross references. —

As to the preservation of existing laws and ordinances when the form of government is changed, see §

15-1-118

.

As to computing periods of time, §

22-2-110

.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

“Established” in subsection (a)(iii) means

that date when the new form of government began to operate, pursuant to §

22-23-404

, and said term is not ambiguous. Committee to Restore Mayor-Council Form of Government v. Rawlins, 692 P.2d 944,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 353

(Wyo. 1984).

No conflict between subsections (a)(ii) and (a)(iii). —

If the combined effect of subsections (a)(ii) and (a)(iii) is to give a new form of government much more than four years to operate before a different form of government can be instituted because of the timing of elections, that is a decision made by the legislature, and it is not for the courts to determine otherwise; said paragraphs do not conflict. Committee to Restore Mayor-Council Form of Government v. Rawlins, 692 P.2d 944,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 353

(Wyo. 1984).

Question of submitting to electors of a Wyoming city proposition of accepting manager form of government

in that city is not controlled directly by the Wyoming constitution nor are the provisions relating thereto specifically designated as initiative and referendum. However, in many states similar provisions are constitutional and are so denominated. State ex rel. Benham v. Cheever, 71 Wyo. 303, 257 P.2d 337,

1953 Wyo. LEXIS 18

(Wyo. 1953).

It is sufficient if petition is signed by qualified electors.

There is no constitutional provision which prohibits the legislature from permitting the signing of the petition by persons not yet registered but who upon registration would be permitted to vote. State ex rel. Keefe v. McInerney, 63 Wyo. 280, 182 P.2d 28,

1947 Wyo. LEXIS 15

(Wyo. 1947).

But it is undoubtedly required and contemplated that signers of petition should at least be residents of city in good faith.

It is hardly probable, however, that it is contemplated that all signers of the petition should be compelled to go on the witness stand to testify to their own qualifications as signers of the petition. That means that resort must be had to secondary and less satisfactory evidence to prove that the requisite number of qualified electors have signed the petition. State ex rel. Keefe v. McInerney, 63 Wyo. 280, 182 P.2d 28,

1947 Wyo. LEXIS 15

(Wyo. 1947).

Prima facie evidence of sufficiency of petitions. —

In a mandamus proceeding by petitioners to compel the mayor of Cheyenne to call an election for determination by the people whether the city should adopt a city manager plan, papers denominated “Petition for manager form of government” filed with the city of Cheyenne, which were introduced into evidence without objection, constituted prima facie evidence sufficient to show that these “petitions” were what they purported to be. Thereafter, it became incumbent upon the city authorities to present evidence to the court questioning the validity and correctness of the petitions, if such officials doubted their propriety and correctness. State ex rel. Benham v. Cheever, 71 Wyo. 303, 257 P.2d 337,

1953 Wyo. LEXIS 18

(Wyo. 1953).

§ 15-11-302.
Rejection of change by voters.

If a change of form of government is rejected by the voters at the special election, the question shall not be resubmitted to the voters for a period of four (4) years following the special election.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-349; W.S. 1977, § 22-23-702; Laws 1998, ch. 100, § 4.